Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.110

Trustees—Open public meetings.

Each board of regional university trustees shall hold at least two regular meetings each year, at such times as may be provided by the board, and shall follow procedures for open public meetings in chapter 42.30 RCW. Each board shall provide time for public comment at each meeting. Special meetings shall be held as may be deemed necessary, whenever called by the chair or by a majority of the board. Public notice of all meetings shall be given in accordance with *chapter 42.32 RCW.

[ 2012 c 228 s 3; 2011 c 336 s 727; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 47. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.110; prior: 1917 c 128 s 1, part; 1909 c 97 p 253 s 6, part; RRS s 4609, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 217, part; 1893 c 107 s 6, part. Formerly RCW 28B.40.110, part; 28.81.040, part.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The only section in chapter 42.32 RCW, RCW 42.32.030, was recodified as RCW 42.30.035 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 30.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Open public meetings act: Chapter 42.30 RCW.